apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="/li__pr">
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>li<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lê</l><r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e><!--
      <e><p><l>lê</l><r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lê</l><r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lê</l><r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="de__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="û__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gelo__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ango__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->

    <pardef n="hwd__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="yek__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekê</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eke</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="şeş__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekê</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eke</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="yekem__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="milyon__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
	<pardef n="herdu__prn">
	  <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ya</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="con"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>yên</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="con"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="çi__prn_itg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="S__ê_dê__enc">
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><j/>dê<s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>dê</l><r><j/>dê<s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="S__dê__enc">
      <e><p><l><b/>dê</l><r><j/>dê<s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ez__prn">
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>ez<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>ez<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>min</l><r>ez<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ew__prn">
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>wî</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wî</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>wê</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wê</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__dê__enc"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/em__prn">
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>em<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>em<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>em<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/hûn__prn">
      <e><p><l>hûn</l><r>hûn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hûn</l><r>hûn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p>  <par n="S__ê_dê__enc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>we</l><r>hûn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ew__prn">
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wî</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wê</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wan</l><r>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ev__prn">
      <e><p><l>ev</l><r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vî</l><r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vê</l><r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>ev<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="xwe__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ku__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="çi__prn_rel">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


   <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="hindek__det"> <!-- CHECK!-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hemû__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="çiqas__det"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ew__det">
      <e><p><l>ew</l><r>ew<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wî</l><r>ew<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wê</l><r>ew<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wan</l><r>ew<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ev__det">
      <e><p><l>ev</l><r>ev<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vî</l><r>ev<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vê</l><r>ev<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>ev<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="heger" r="LR"><p><l>eger</l><r>heger</r></p><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="heger" r="LR"><p><l>heke</l><r>heger</r></p><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="heger" r="LR"><p><l>heker</l><r>heger</r></p><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="heger" r="LR"><p><l>heka</l><r>heger</r></p><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ango" r="LR"><p><l>anku</l><r>ango</r></p><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="qey"><i>qey</i><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="yanî"><i>yanî</i><par n="ango__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="û"><i>û</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lê"><i>lê</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lê belê"><i>lê<b/>belê</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="yan"><i>yan</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="anjî"><i>anjî</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bê ku"><i>bê<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dema"><i>dema</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gorî ku"><i>gorî<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="heta ku"><i>heta<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="jibona ku"><i>jibona<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ku" r="LR"><p><l>kû</l><r>ku</r></p><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="piştî ku"><i>piştî<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wexta"><i>wexta</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="li"><i/><par n="/li__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="de__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ve"><i>ve</i><par n="de__post"/></e>
    <e lm="re"><i>re</i><par n="de__post"/></e>
    <e lm="herdu"><i>herdu</i><par n="herdu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="herdu"><p><l>herdû</l><r>herdu</r></p><par n="herdu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ez"><i/><par n="/ez__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>t</i><par n="t/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ew"><i/><par n="ew__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i/><par n="/em__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hûn"><i/><par n="/hûn__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ew"><i/><par n="/ew__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ev"><i/><par n="/ev__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="xwe"><i>xwe</i><par n="xwe__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="xwe"><p><l>xo</l><r>xwe</r></p><par n="xwe__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hev"><i>hev</i><par n="xwe__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ku"><i>ku</i><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="çi"><i>çi</i><par n="çi__prn_itg"/></e>
    <e lm="kî"><i>kî</i><par n="çi__prn_itg"/></e>
    <e lm="çiqas"><i>çiqas</i><par n="çiqas__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kîjan"><i>kîjan</i><par n="çiqas__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ev"><i></i><par n="/ev__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ew"><i></i><par n="/ew__det"/></e>
    <e lm="çend"><i>çend</i><par n="hindek__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hin"><i>hin</i><par n="hindek__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hindek"><i>hindek</i><par n="hindek__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hemû"><i>hemû</i><par n="hemû__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hindek" r="LR"><p><l>hinek</l><r>hindek</r></p><par n="hindek__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hindek" r="LR"><p><l>hindik</l><r>hindek</r></p><par n="hindek__det"/></e>
    <e lm="yek"><i>yek</i><par n="yek__num"/></e>
    <e lm="çar"><i>çar</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="şeş"><i>şeş</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="heşt"><i>heşt</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="deh"><i>deh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dwanzdeh"><i>dwanzdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="çardeh"><i>çardeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hijdeh"><i>hijdeh</i><par n="şeş__num"/></e>
    <e lm="yekem"><i>yekem</i><par n="yekem__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hezar"><i>hezar</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="bîst"><i>bîst</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="milyon"><i>milyon</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pencî"><i>pencî</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="şestî"><i>şestî</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="z."><i>z.</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="b."><i>z.</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="e. s."><i>e.<b/>s.</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="m."><i>z.</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="hwd"><i>hwd</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="km"><i>km</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="m"><i>m</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Dr."><i>Dr.</i><par n="hwd__abbr"/></e>
